District of Columbia statutes.
38-1241.01

Transfer of capital budget authority and funding to the University of the District of Columbia.

Beginning October 1, 2009, all University of the District of Columbia (“UDC”) capital projects shall be the responsibility of UDC to implement. The budget authority and any unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, income, and other funds for all UDC capital projects shall be transferred from the Department of Real Estate Services (formerly, the Office of Property Management) to UDC upon October 15, 2009.

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 4141, 57 DCR 181
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4141 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4141 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
Short title: Section 4140 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle O of title IV of the act may be cited as the “Transfer of Capital Budget Authority and Funding to the University of the District of Columbia Act of 2009”.